Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB790.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 823. Hospital emergency abortion services.(a) Abortion.--Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a hospital with an emergency department located in this Commonwealth shall provide abortion services to an individual presenting for care at the hospital if the individual 123456789101112131415161718192021 has an emergency medical condition and an abortion is necessary to stabilize the individual.(b) Requirements.--A hospital is deemed to have satisfied subsection (a) if the hospital offers abortion services to an individual and the individual or the individual's legal representative refuses to consent to the examination and treatment upon being notified of the risks and benefits to the individual of the examination and treatment. The hospital shall take all reasonable steps to secure the written informed consent of the individual or person acting on the individual's behalf to refuse the examination and treatment.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency department." An entity within a hospital that is organizationally distinct from other outpatient facilities and whose primary function is to provide emergency accident or emergency medical or surgical care."Emergency medical condition."(1) A medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in:(i) placing the health of the individual in serious jeopardy;(ii) serious impairment to bodily functions; or(iii) serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.(2) The term includes:(i) an ectopic pregnancy;(ii) complications resulting from pregnancy or of 20250HB0790PN0814 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pregnancy loss;(iii) risks to future fertility;(iv) previable preterm premature rupture of membranes;(v) placental abnormalities; or(vi) emergent hypertensive disorders, such as preeclampsia."Stabilize." To provide medical treatment to an individual as may be necessary to ensure, within reasonable medical probability, that no material deterioration of the condition is likely to result from, or occur during, the transfer of the individual from a facility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0790PN0814 - 3 - 12345678910111213